Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.592

College textbook information—Publishers' duties.

(1) Each publisher of college textbooks shall make immediately available to faculty of institutions of higher education:

(a) The price at which the publisher would make the products available to the store run by or in a contractual relationship with the institution of higher education that would offer the products to students; and

(b) The history of revisions for the products, if any.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Immediately available" means with any marketing materials presented to a member of the faculty.

(b) "Products" means all versions of a textbook or set of textbooks, except custom textbooks or special editions of textbooks, available in the subject area for which a faculty member is teaching a course, including supplemental items, both when sold together or separately from a textbook.

[ 2007 c 186 s 1.]